Washington statutes.
RCW 9.16.020

Imitating lawful brand.

Every person who, in any county, places upon any property, any brand or mark in the likeness or similitude of another brand or mark filed with the county auditor of such county by the owner thereof as a brand or mark for the designation or identification of a like kind of property, is:

(1) If done with intent to confuse or commingle such property with, or to appropriate to his or her own use, the property of such other owner, guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than five years, or by imprisonment in the county jail for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, or by both fine and imprisonment; or

(2) If done without such intent, guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 96 s 5; 1992 c 7 s 4; 1909 c 249 s 343; RRS s 2595.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.